New York, session 2025-2026, A10962.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 48 of section 3 of the public officers law, as 2 added by chapter 518 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as follows: 3 48. In the county of Montgomery, the provisions of this section 4 requiring a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or 5 municipal corporation of the state for which such person shall be chosen 6 or within which such person's official functions are required to be 7 exercised, shall not prevent a person from holding the office of deputy 8 sheriff in Montgomery county, provided, however, that such person 9 performing the duties and functions of deputy sheriff resides in Mont- 10 gomery county or any adjoining county within New York state unless 11 otherwise provided by an act of the state legislature. Such person 12 performing the duties and functions of deputy sheriff may also reside in 13 Albany county, Delaware county, Greene county, Hamilton county, Madison 14 county, Oneida county, Rensselaer county, Warren county, or Washington 15 county. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13656-02-5